Utah statutes.
77-2-9.   Offenses ineligible for diversion.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), diversion may not be granted by a magistrate for:

(a)  a capital felony;

(b)  a felony in the first degree;

(c)  any case involving a sexual offense against a victim who is under the age of 14;

(d)  any motor vehicle related offense involving alcohol or drugs;

(e)  any case involving using a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;

(f)  driving a motor vehicle or commercial motor vehicle on a revoked or suspended license;

(g)  any case involving operating a commercial motor vehicle in a negligent manner causing the death of another including the offenses of:

(i)  manslaughter under Section 76-5-205; or

(ii)  negligent homicide under Section 76-5-206; or

(h)  a crime of domestic violence as defined in Section 77-36-1.

(2)  When a person under the age of 16 is alleged to have committed any violation of Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, Sexual Offenses, the court may enter a diversion in the matter if the court enters on the record its findings that:

(a)  the person did not use coercion or force;

(b)  there is no more than two years' difference between the ages of the participants; and

(c)  it would be in the best interest of the person to grant diversion.



Amended by Chapter 146, 2009 General Session

